ja: 家具 > 棚・シェルフ関連用品: 棚板; 棚受けブラケット; 棚用仕切り・整理用品; 棚用ライナー・カバー; 棚ダボ・ペグ; 棚用支柱・ポール; 棚用レール・ガード
sk-SK: Nábytok > Policové príslušenstvo: Náhradné police; Policové konzoly; Oddeľovače a organizéry na police; Vložky a kryty na police; Kolíky a podpery na police; Stĺpiky a zvislé nosníky na regály; Zábradlia a ochranné kryty na police
de: Möbel > Regalzubehör: Ersatzregale; Regalhalterungen; Regalteiler & Organizer; Regaleinlagen & Abdeckungen; Regalbodenträger; Regalpfosten & Stützen; Regalschienen & Rausfallschutz
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Dodatki za police: Nadomestne police; Nosilci za police; Razdelilniki in organizatorji za police; Obloge in prevleke za police; Klini in zatiči za police; Stebrički za police; Ograde in varovala za police
hu: Bútor > Polckiegészítők: Cserepolcok; Polctartó konzolok; Polcelválasztók és rendszerezők; Polcvédő betétek és takarók; Polctartó csapok és szegek; Polctartó oszlopok és profilok; Polcsínek és -korlátok
pt-BR: Móveis > Acessórios para prateleiras: Prateleiras de substituição; Suportes para prateleiras; Divisores e organizadores de prateleiras; Forros e capas para prateleiras; Pinos e suportes para prateleiras; Colunas e suportes verticais para prateleiras; Trilhos e protetores para prateleiras
ro-RO: Mobilier > Accesorii pentru rafturi: Rafturi de schimb; Console pentru rafturi; Separatoare și organizatoare pentru rafturi; Căptușeli și huse pentru rafturi; Cuie și știfturi pentru rafturi; Stâlpi și montanți pentru rafturi; Șine și protecții pentru rafturi
it: Arredamento > Accessori per scaffali: Scaffali di ricambio; Staffe per mensole; Divisori e organizer per mensole; Rivestimenti e coperture per mensole; Perni e picchetti per mensole; Montanti e supporti verticali per scaffali; Sponde e barriere per mensole
fr: Meubles > Accessoires pour étagères: Étagères de rechange; Équerres pour étagères; Séparateurs et organisateurs d'étagères; Revêtements et housses pour étagères; Taquets et chevilles pour étagères; Poteaux et montants pour étagères; Rails et protections pour étagères
es: Mobiliario > Accesorios para estanterías: Estanterías de repuesto; Soportes para estantes; Organizadores y separadores de estantes; Revestimientos y cubiertas para estantes; Clavijas y soportes para estantes; Postes y montantes para estantes; Rieles y protectores para estantes
hr-HR: Namještaj > Pribor za police: Zamjenske police; Nosači za policu; Pregrade i organizatori za policu; Obloge i navlake za policu; Klinovi i vijci za policu; Stupovi i uspravni elementi za policu; Ograde i štitnici za policu
vi: Đồ gỗ > Phụ kiện kệ: Kệ thay thế; Giá đỡ kệ; Vách ngăn và khay phân loại cho kệ; Tấm lót và tấm phủ kệ; Chốt và đinh đỡ kệ; Cột và trụ kệ; Thanh ray và thanh chắn kệ
pl: Meble > Akcesoria do półek i regałów: Półki zapasowe; Wsporniki do półek; Przegrody i organizery do półek; Maty i pokrowce na półki; Kołki i podpórki do półek; Słupki i profile do półek; Relingi i zabezpieczenia do półek
en: Furniture > Shelving Accessories: Replacement Shelves; Shelf Brackets; Shelf Dividers & Organizers; Shelf Liners & Covers; Shelf Pins & Pegs; Shelf Posts & Uprights; Shelf Rails & Guards
cs: Nábytek > Příslušenství k policím: Náhradní police; Konzoly na police; Rozdělovače a organizéry do polic; Vložky a kryty na police; Policové podpěrky a kolíky; Sloupky a stojny k regálům; Ohrádky a zábrany na police
ru: Мебель > Аксессуары для стеллажей: Полки для стеллажей; Кронштейны для полок; Разделители для полок и органайзеры; Коврики и чехлы для полок; Полкодержатели и штифты; Стойки и профили для стеллажей; Ограничители и бортики для полок
zh-TW: 家具 > 層架組裝配件: 隔層板; 層板托架; 層架分隔板與收納配件; 層架墊與防塵罩; 層板托銷與插銷; 層架立柱與支架; 層架護欄與擋板
lt-LT: Baldai > Lentynų priedai: Atsarginės lentynos; Lentynos laikikliai; Lentynų skirtukai ir organizatoriai; Lentynų įdėklai ir uždangalai; Lentynų kaiščiai ir laikikliai; Lentynų stovai ir statramsčiai; Lentynų turėklai ir apsaugos
da: Møbler > Tilbehør til hylder: Erstatningshylder; Hyldeknægte; Hyldedelere og rumdelere; Hyldeunderlag og -overtræk; Hyldebærere og -tapper; Reolstolper og -vanger; Hyldeskinner og -afskærmninger
sv: Möbler > Tillbehör till hyllmöbler: Reservhyllor; Hyllkonsoler; Hyllavdelare och förvaringslösningar; Hyllmattor och överdrag; Hyllbärare och hyllstift; Hyllstolpar och gavlar; Hyllskenor och skydd
tr: Mobilyalar > Raf Aksesuarları: Yedek Raflar; Raf destekleri; Raf bölücü ve düzenleyiciler; Raf örtüleri ve kılıfları; Raf pimi ve çivileri; Raf dikmeleri ve ayakları; Raf rayları ve korumaları
el: Έπιπλα > Αξεσουάρ ραφιών: Ανταλλακτικά ράφια; Γωνίες στήριξης ραφιών; Διαχωριστικά και οργανωτές ραφιών; Επενδύσεις και καλύμματα ραφιών; Πείροι και στηρίγματα ραφιών; Ορθοστάτες ραφιών; Ράγες και προστατευτικά ραφιών
zh-CN: 家具 > 架子配件: 更换架; 搁板托架; 置物架分隔件与收纳件; 搁板垫衬与保护套; 搁板销钉与木塞; 搁板立柱与支架; 搁板护栏与挡板
ko: 가구 > 선반 부대용품: 교체용 선반; 선반 브래킷; 선반 디바이더 및 오거나이저; 선반 라이너 및 커버; 선반 핀 및 페그; 선반 기둥 및 업라이트; 선반 레일 및 가드
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > อุปกรณ์ชั้นวาง: อะไหล่ชั้นวาง; ฉากรับชั้นวาง; แผงกั้นและอุปกรณ์จัดระเบียบชั้นวาง; แผ่นรองและที่คลุมชั้นวาง; หมุดและตัวรับชั้นวาง; เสาและโครงตั้งชั้นวาง; ราวและขอบกันตกชั้นวาง
nb: Møbler > Hylletilbehør: Erstatningshyller; Hylleknekter; Hylledelere og oppbevaringsløsninger; Hylleunderlag og trekk; Hyllebærere og plugger; Hyllestolper og veggskinner; Hyllekantlister og beskyttelse
fi: Huonekalut > Hyllyjen lisätarvikkeet: Hyllylevyt; Hyllynkannattimet; Hyllynjakajat ja -järjestelijät; Hyllynpäälliset ja -suojat; Hyllytapit ja -kannattimet; Hyllypylväät ja pystytuet; Hyllykaiteet ja -suojat
nl: Meubelen > Accessoires voor planken: Vervangende planken; Plankendragers; Plankverdelers en organizers; Plankbeschermers en -hoezen; Plankdragers en pinnen; Plankstaanders; Plankrails en -beschermers
bg-BG: Мебели > Стелажни рафтове и первази: Резервни рафтове; Държачи за рафтове; Разделители и органайзери за рафтове; Подложки и покривала за рафтове; Щифтове и крепежни елементи за рафтове; Стълбове и стойки за рафтове; Релси и предпазители за рафтове
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Acessórios para prateleiras: Prateleiras de substituição; Suportes para prateleiras; Divisórias e organizadores de prateleiras; Forros e coberturas para prateleiras; Pinos e suportes para prateleiras; Postes e suportes verticais para prateleiras; Calhas e proteções para prateleiras